Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1134.
do enact as follows:AB1134,11Section 1. 758.20 (2) (intro.) and (a) of the statutes are consolidated, 2renumbered 758.20 (2) and amended to read:AB1134,2,83758.20 (2) The If a writ of restitution is granted in a civil action of eviction, 4the director of state courts may not remove case management information from the 5Wisconsin Circuit Court Access Internet site for a civil case that the eviction action 6if it is not a closed, confidential, or sealed case for the following periods: (a) If a writ 7of restitution has been granted in an eviction action, a period of at least 10 years 8following the grant of the writ.AB1134,29Section 2. 758.20 (2) (b) of the statutes is repealed.AB1134,310Section 3. 758.20 (2m) of the statutes is created to read:AB1134,2,1411758.20 (2m) Notwithstanding sub. (2), if a civil action of eviction is dismissed, 12the director of state courts shall promptly redact the defendants’ names from the 13case management information for the eviction action from the Wisconsin Circuit 14Court Access Internet site.AB1134,415Section 4. Initial applicability.AB1134,2,1716(1) The treatment of s. 758.20 (2m) first applies to an eviction action that is 17dismissed on the effective date of this subsection.AB1134,2,1818